Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 4. Triennial Census.

§§ 22.1-281 through 22.1-286.
Repealed by Acts 2010, cc. 386 and 629, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former Article 4 (§§ 22.1-281 through 22.1-286) of Chapter 14 of Title 22.1, requiring triennial census of school population for school funding purposes, was derived from Code 1950, §§ 22-97, 22-223 through 22-228, 22-286; 1954, cc. 291, 638; 1959, Ex. Sess., c. 79, § 1; 1966, c. 605; 1968, cc. 178, 501; 1970, cc. 496, 525; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 161; 1972, c. 245; 1973, c. 99; 1975, cc. 140, 308, 328, 568; 1976, cc. 680, 681, 713; 1978, cc. 430, 518; 1980, c. 559, §§ 22.1-281 through 22.1-286; 1992, cc. 163, 755; 2000, c. 285; 2005, c. 716.

Acts 2010, cc. 386 and 629, cl. 3 provides: “That the annual cost incurred by the Weldon Cooper Center for Public Service of the University of Virginia in preparing the projected annual estimates required by this act, not to exceed $115,000, shall be deducted from the amount appropriated for state sales and use tax distribution to localities based on school age population, with the net amount of funding after such payments to be distributed to localities. Funding not to exceed $115,000 each year shall be transferred from the amount appropriated in Direct Aid to Public Education for state sales and use tax distribution to localities based on school age population to the Weldon Cooper Center for Public Service at the University of Virginia. The Weldon Cooper Center for Public Service at the University of Virginia shall provide the Department of Education with the yearly population estimate by June 30 of each year.”

Acts 2010, cc. 386 and 629, cl. 4 provides: “That the estimate of population provided by the Weldon Cooper Center for Public Service at the University of Virginia be used as the basis for apportionment and distribution of sales tax revenues to public school divisions beginning July 1, 2012.”